src/fst/morphology/phonology.twolc
! =============================================== !
!! # The Mansi morphophonological/twolc rule file
! =============================================== !

!! This file documents the [phonology.twolc file](http://github.com/giellalt/lang-mns/blob/main/src/fst/phonology.twolc) 

!! Скрибник Е.К. & К.В. Афанасьева 2007:
!! Практически курс манийского языка, Часть 1. Ханты-Мансийск. Полиграфист.


!! ## Alphabet, sets and definitions
!! ### Alphabet
Alphabet
!! Basic letters:
а б в г д е ё ж з и й к л м н о п р с т    !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
у ф х ц ч ш щ ъ ы ь э ю я ӈ                !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
А Б В Г Д Е Ё Ж З И Й К Л М Н О П Р С Т    !!≈ * **@CODE@** 
У Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Щ Ъ Ы Ь Э Ю Я Ӈ                !!≈ * **@CODE@** 

!! Letters with diacritical marks:
!! Precomposed letters are used when available, otherwise non-composed ones.

ӣ ӯ !!≈ * **@CODE@** precomposed long vowels
Ӣ Ӯ !!≈ * **@CODE@** precomposed long vowels
а̄ е̄ о̄ ы̄ э̄ ю̄ я̄ ё̄ А̄ Е̄ О̄ Ы̄ Э̄ Ю̄ Я̄     !!≈ * **@CODE@** non-precomposed long vowels

ҥ Ҥ

!! #### Archiphones

%{аяØ%}:0     !!≈ * **@CODE@** PxPl3 %{аяØ%}ныл
%{ыиØ%}:0     !!≈ * **@CODE@** Loc and Ins and ...
%{уюØ%}:0     !!≈ * **@CODE@** suffix onset vowel
%{ЫИ%}:и      !!≈ * **@CODE@**
%{ЫИ%}:ы      !!≈ * **@CODE@**
%{аяLong%}:а̄  !!≈ * **@CODE@** ScPl3+OcSg %{аяLong%}ныл
%{ЭЕLong%}:е̄  !!≈ * **@CODE@** +V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1
%{ЭЕLong%}:э̄  !!≈ * **@CODE@** +V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1
!%{ЭЕLong%}:е !!≈ * **@CODE@** +V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1 VU
!%{ЭЕLong%}:э !!≈ * **@CODE@** +V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1 VU
%{ЭЕ%}:е      !!≈ * **@CODE@** PxSg3
%{ЭЕ%}:э      !!≈ * **@CODE@** PxSg3
%{УЮØ%}:0     !!≈ * **@CODE@**
%{йØ%}:0      !!≈ * **@CODE@** ыг
%{Øы%}:0    !!≈ * **@CODE@** Loc
%{ыØ%}:ы    !!≈ * **@CODE@** specific floating vowel 
%{иØ%}:и    !!≈ * **@CODE@** specific floating vowel 
%{уØ%}:у    !!≈ * **@CODE@** specific floating vowel +N+Sg+PxDu1+Nom %{уØ%} м е̄ н
%{тØ%}:0    !!≈ * **@CODE@** PxSg3, Ins



!! #### Triggers
%{VO%}:0    !!≈ __@CODE@__ Stem ending in vowel other than и ы
%{VI%}:0    !!≈ __@CODE@__ Stem ending in vowel и or ы
%{SYNCH%}:0    !!≈ __@CODE@__ Stem with syncope with и, ы, у hard
%{SYNCS%}:0    !!≈ __@CODE@__ Stem with syncope with и, ы, у soft
%{NOSYNCH%}:0    !!≈ __@CODE@__ Stem without syncope with и, ы, у hard
%{NOSYNCS%}:0    !!≈ __@CODE@__ Stem without syncope with и, ы, у soft
%{VCH%}:0    !!≈ __@CODE@__ Stem ending in single hard consonant
%{VCCH%}:0    !!≈ __@CODE@__ Stem ending in hard consonant cluster
%{VCS%}:0    !!≈ __@CODE@__ Stem ending in single soft consonant
%{VCCS%}:0    !!≈ __@CODE@__ Stem ending in soft consonant cluster

%{VA%}:0    !!≈ __@CODE@__ -аӈкве verb
%{VU%}:0    !!≈ __@CODE@__ -уӈкве verb

%^PxDu2:0    !!≈ * **@CODE@**
%^PxDu3:0    !!≈ * **@CODE@**
%^PxPl2:0    !!≈ * **@CODE@**
%^RmVow:0    !!≈ * **@CODE@** Word-final vowel removal
%^Syncope:0    !!≈ * **@CODE@** This triggers syncope with no reason to place special letters in the stem.

!! #### Literal quotes and angles
!! These must be escaped (cf morpheme boundaries below):

 »7     !! * »7
 «7     !! * «7
 %[%>%] !! * >
 %[%<%] !! * <

!! ### Boundaries

 %> # !!≈  **@CODE@** for suffix and word end

!! #### Morpheme boundaries:
 «  !!≈ * **@CODE@** = Derivational prefix
 »  !!≈ * **@CODE@** = Derivational suffix
 %< !!≈ * **@CODE@** = Inflectional prefix
 %> !!≈ * **@CODE@** = Inflectional suffix
 #  !!≈ * **@CODE@** = Word boundary for both lexicalised and dynamic compounds
 %^ !!≈ * **@CODE@** = (exceptional) soft hyphenation point
 %- !!≈ * **@CODE@** = Hyphen for question particle
 ð  !!≈ * **@CODE@** = Compounding rules

!! End of alphabet definitions
 ;

!! ### Sets
Sets

 Vow = а е и о у ы э ю я               !!≈ * **@CODE@**
       А Е И О У Ы Э Ю Я               !!≈  **@CODE@**
       а̄ е̄ ӣ о̄ ӯ ы̄ э̄ ю̄ я̄ ё̄       !!≈  **@CODE@**
       А̄ Е̄ Ӣ О̄ Ӯ Ы̄ Э̄ Ю̄ Я̄ Ё̄ ;  !!≈  **@CODE@**
 VowNoI = а е   о у э ю я                   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          А Е   О У Э Ю Я                   !!≈  **@CODE@**
          а̄ е̄ ӣ о̄ ӯ ы̄ э̄ ю̄ я̄ ё̄       !!≈  **@CODE@**
          А̄ Е̄ Ӣ О̄ Ӯ Ы̄ Э̄ Ю̄ Я̄ Ё̄ ;   !!≈  **@CODE@**
  PalVow = е ё и ю я е̄ ӣ ю̄ я̄ ё̄ ;  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
SVow = а е ё и о у ы э ю я ; !!≈ * **@CODE@**
LVow = а̄ е̄ ё̄ ӣ о̄ ӯ ы̄ э̄ ю̄ я̄ ; !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 CnsSoft = щ Щ  ;  !!≈ * **@CODE@**
 CnsNonAlv = б в г ж к м п ф х ц ч ш ӈ   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
             Б В Г Ж К М П Ф Х Ц Ч Ш Ӈ  ; !!≈  **@CODE@**
 CnsNoReqFront = б в г к м п ф х ӈ   !!≈ * **@CODE@**
                 Б В Г К М П Ф Х Ӈ  ; !!≈  **@CODE@**
 CnsAlv = д з л н с т !!≈ * **@CODE@**
          Д З Л Н С Т ; !!≈  **@CODE@**
 Cns = CnsSoft CnsNonAlv CnsAlv  р Р й Й ;  !!≈ * **@CODE@**


!! ### Definitions
Definitions

Pal = [%{VCCS%}:|%{VCS%}:|%{SYNCS%}:|%{NOSYNCS%}:] ;


! PostSyncStem  =  :Cns  %+:0 ;
PostSyncStem  =  :Cns   ;  !!≈ * **@CODE@** 


!! ## Rules
Rules


!! ### Syncope rules

"Syncope for ы"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**  
 ы:0 <=>           Cns _ (Cns) [Cns - й] [%{SYNCH%}:|%{SYNCS%}:] %> [ы: [т|н|г|л|ӈ]|ы̄:|а|э|%{аяØ%}:|%{уюØ%}:|(%{тØ%}:) [%{ЭЕ%}:|%{ЭЕLong%}:]] ;
%{VA%}: %> %{аяØ%}: %> _ ;
         [%{VI%}:]  %> _ [т|л] ; !Plural
       ы [%{VI%}:]  %> _ [н] ; ! PxSg2
         [%{VO%}:]  %> _ [г|т|л|н|м] ; !Pl, Tra, Du,PxPl2
                   Cns _ (Cns) [Cns - й] [%{SYNCH%}:|%{SYNCS%}:] %>  %{ыиØ%}: т ; !Loc
[э̄|а̄|ы|и] (%{VU%}:) %> _ ;

!ё х т ы {VU}:0 > ы:0 с

!! тэ̄ӈкве+V+Act+Ind+Prt+ScSg1+OcSg: __eat/syödä__
!!€ тэ̄>ыслум
!!€ тэ̄>0слум
!!€ ловиньт{VA}>{аяØ}>ыс
!!€ ловиньт0>а>0с
!! павыл+N+Pl+Nom:
!!€ павыл{SYNCH}>ыт
!!€ пав0л0>ыт
!!
!!€ хӯрыг{SYNCH}>ыт
!! кол+N+Pl+Nom: **house/koti**
!!€ кол{VCH}>ыт
!!€ кол0>ыт
!! кол+N+Sg+Loc: **house/koti**
!!€ кол{VCH}>{ыиØ}т
!!€ кол0>0т
!! класс+N+Sg+Loc:
!!€ класс{VCCH}>{ыиØ}т
!!€ класс0>ыт
!! класс+N+Pl+Nom:
!!€ класс{VCCH}>ыт
!!€ класс0>ыт

"Syncope for и"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**  
 и:0 <=> Cns _ (Cns) [Cns - й] [%{SYNCH%}:|%{SYNCS%}:] %> [%{ыиØ%}:|а|%{аяØ%}:|%{уюØ%}:|%{ЭЕ%}:] ;

"Syncope for у"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**  
 у:0 <=> Cns _ (Cns) [Cns - й] [%{SYNCH%}:|%{SYNCS%}:] %> [%{ыиØ%}:| ы т|а|%{аяØ%}:|%{уюØ%}:|(%{тØ%}:) %{ЭЕ%}:] ;


!! ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+PxPl1+Nom:  **language/kieli**
!!€ ла̄тыӈ{SYNCH}>{уюØ}в
!!€ ла̄т0ӈ0>ув
!! яныг+N+Sg+Loc:
!!€ яныг{SYNCH}>{ыиØ}т
!!€ ян0г0>ыт


!! ### Vowel lengthening rules

"a becomes long"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
 а:а̄ <=> _ %{VO%}: %> ы̄: ; 
     _ %{VO%}: %> %{аяLong%}: ;

"ja becomes long"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
 я:я̄ <=> _ %{VO%}: %> ы̄: ; 
     _ %{VO%}: %> %{аяLong%}: ;

"y becomes long"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
 ы:ы̄ <=> Cns _ %{VI%}: %> ы̄: ; 

"long y disappears"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**
 ы̄:0 <=>  [%{VO%}:|%{VI%}:] %> _ ;

!! #### Tests:
 
! !€ апа>{йØ}ыт
! !€ апа>00т
! ! аки+N+Du+Nom:  __paternal uncle younger than father__
! !€ аки>{йØ}ыг
! !€ аки>0иг
!!€ ха̄п>{йØ}ыт
!!€ ха̄п>0ыт
!!€ апа>ныл
!!€ апа>ныл
!!€ паль{VCS}>ныл
!!€ паль0>ныл
! !€ ха̄п>ыныл
! !€ ха̄п>0ныл  

!! #### Tests:

!!€ паль{VCS}>{йØ}{ыиØ}т
!!€ пал00>0ит

!! #### Tests:

!!€ а̄ны{VI}>{йØ}{ыиØ}г
!!€ а̄ны0>0иг
!! аки+N+Sg+Tra: __as an uncle__
!!€ аки{VI}>{йØ}{ыиØ}г
!!€ аки0>0иг


!! ### Rules for ы/и/ь in different contexts

!%{ыиØ%}:0
"Vow ы in loc appears"
%{ыиØ%}:0 <=>
 [%{SYNCH%}:] %> _ [н] ;
  [%{SYNCS%}:|%{VO%}:] %> _ [т|н] ;

!%{ыиØ%}:ы this is for Loc
"Vow ы in loc appears"
%{ыиØ%}:ы <=>
     [%{SYNCH%}:] %> _ [т|л|я] ;
     [%{NOSYNCH%}:] %> _ [л|я] ;
     [%{VCH%}:|%{VCCH%}:] %> _ [т|н|л|я] ;
     [CnsAlv: | CnsNonAlv] [%{VU%}:|%{VA%}:] %> _ (%>) н ;
     [CnsAlv: | CnsNonAlv - [г|к|ж|ч|ш|б|ф|х]] [%{VU%}:|%{VA%}:] %> _ (%>) м ;
!     [CnsAlv: ] [%{VU%}:|%{VA%}:] %> _ (%>) [м|н] ;
!! павыл+N+Sg+Loc:
!!€ павыл{SYNCH}>{ыиØ}т
!!€ павыл0>0т
!!
!! я̄ӈк+N+Sg+Loc: **ice/jää**
!!€ я̄ӈк{VCCH}>{ыиØ}т
!!€ я̄ӈк0>ыт

"Vow и in loc appears"
%{ыиØ%}:и <=>
     [%{SYNCS%}:|%{NOSYNCS%}:] %> _ [л|я] ;
     [%{VCCS%}:|%{VCS%}:] %> _ [т|н|л|я] ;
     [CnsSoft  | р | Р | й: | Й:] [%{VU%}:|%{VA%}:] %> _ %> н ;
     [CnsSoft | г |к|ж|ч|ш|б|ф|х| р | Р | й: | Й:] [%{VU%}:|%{VA%}:] %> _ %> м ;
!     [CnsSoft | CnsNonAlv | р | Р | й: | Й:] %{VU%}: %> _ [м|н] ;
!!ансамбль+N+Sg+Loc: **band/yhtye**
!!€ ансамбль{VCCS}>{ыиØ}т
!!€ ансамбл00>ит
!!€ паль{VCS}>{ыи0}т
!!€ пал00>ит

"Vow и in plural ы to и"
ы:и <=>
 [ %{VCCS%}: | %{VCS%}: ] %> _ [т|н|г|л|с] ;
  [%{SYNCS%}:] %> _ [т|н|г|л] ;
  [%{VI%}:] %> _ [г] ;
  [CnsSoft | ь: | й: | Й:] [%{VA%}:|%{VU%}:] %> _ [м|с .#. ] ;
!  [CnsSoft | CnsNonAlv | р | Р | й: | Й:] [%{VA%}:|%{VU%}:] %> _ [м|с .#. ] ;
!!ансамбль+N+Pl+Nom: **band/yhtye**
!!€ ансамбль{VCCS}>ыт
!!€ ансамбл00>ит
!!€ паль{VCS}>ыт
!!€ пал00>ит
!о̄ н ь щ {VU}:0 ы:и > ы:0 с 2024–09-19

"long Vow ӣ in plural ы̄ to ӣ"
ы̄:ӣ <=>
 [ %{VCCS%}: | %{VCS%}: ] %> _ [т] ;
  [%{SYNCS%}:] %> _ [т|н|г] ;

!! #### Tests:
!ве̄рмуӈкве+Ind+Prs+ScSg3+OcPl:
!!€ ве̄рмы%>%{ЫИ%}янэ
!!€ ве̄рм0%>иянэ

! +V+Ind+Prs+ScSg1:
! € >%{ЭЕLong%}гум

!! #### Tests:

!!€ вармаль{VCS}>{ыиØ}т
!!€ вармал00>ит
!!$ та̄л{VCS}>{ыиØ}г
!!$ та̄л0>иг


!! #### Tests:

!!€ са̄лы{VI}>{аяØ}гын
!!€ са̄лы0>ягын

!! #### Tests:

!!€ са̄лы{VI}>{уюØ}м
!!€ са̄лы0>0м
!!€ аки{VI}>{уюØ}м
!!€ аки0>0м



"Soft sign deletion for и suffixes"
!! **RULE: @RULENAME@**  2023.02
ь:0 <=>
    _ [%{VCCS%}:|%{VCS%}:|%{SYNCS%}:] %>  [%{ыиØ%}: | ы:] [т|н|л]; !! ансамбль+N+Sg+Loc: **band/yhtye**
    _ [%{VCCS%}:|%{VCS%}:|%{SYNCS%}:] %>  ы: [т|г|м]; !! ансамбль+N+Pl+Nom: **band/yhtye**
    _ [%{VCCS%}:|%{VCS%}:|%{SYNCS%}:] %> (%{йØ%}:0)  %{ыиØ%}: [г]; !! ансамбль+N+Sg+Loc: **band/yhtye**
!!€ ансамбль{VCCS}>{ыиØ}т
!!€ ансамбл00>ит
!! куль+N+Sg+Ins:
!!€ куль{VCS}>ыл
!!€ кул00>ил
    _ [%{VU%}:|%{VA%}:|%{VCCS%}:|%{VCS%}:|%{SYNCS%}:] %> [%{уюØ%}:| %{аяØ%}: | ы: | %{ЫИ%}:]; !! XX+V+Inf: ****

 Vow н: _ щ %{VU%}: %> с ;
 Cns _  [%{VCCS%}:|%{VCS%}:] %> [ %{тØ%}: [ %{ЭЕ%}: | %{ЭЕLong%}: ]] ;
!ща̄нь:0{VCS}:0>{тØ}:0{ЭЕ}:е
!Cns _ (ы:0) %> (%{йØ%}:0) [:PalVow| %{тØ%}: [ %{ЭЕ%}: | %{ЭЕLong%}: ]] ;
!above

!! #### Tests:

!! ха̄ль+N+Sg+Nom+PxSg3
!!€ ха̄ль{VCS}>{тØ}{ЭЕ}
!!€ ха̄л00>0е

!!€ паль{VCS}>{йØ}{ыиØ}г
!!€ пал00>0иг
! In light of the yaml file saali, this seems wrong, we want са̄лыиг, нот са̄лыйыг
!"%{йØ%}:й instertion for vowel initial suffixes on ы final stems"
!%{йØ%}:й <=> [ы|и] %> _ ы г ;
!€ са̄лы{VI}>0{ыиØ}г
!€ са̄лы0>йыг

!!TESTS
!echo 'л а̄ т {ыØ}:0 ӈ > {уюØ}:у в' | hfst-pair-test src/fst/phonology.compose.hfst
!echo 'х а̄ л ь:0 > {тØ}:0 {ЭЕ}:е' | hfst-pair-test src/fst/phonology.compose.hfst
!echo 'я н ы > {тØ}:т ы л' | hfst-pair-test src/fst/phonology.compose.hfst
!echo 'о к р у г > {уюØ}:у в' | hfst-pair-test src/fst/phonology.compose.hfst
!echo 'ла̄тыӈ+N+Sg+Nom' | hfst-lookup src/morphology/lexicon.hfst

!! павыл+N+Pl+Nom:
!!€ павыл{SYNCH}>ыт
!!€ пав0л0>ыт


!! ### Stem vowel rules

"%{аяØ%}:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__ deletes а/я after VO vowel stems
%{аяØ%}:0 <=> %{VO%}:  %> _  ;
!VowNoI  %> _  ;


"%{аяØ%}:а"
!! __@RULENAME@__
 %{аяØ%}:а <=> [%{SYNCH%}: | %{NOSYNCH%}: | %{VCH%}: | щ %{VCS%}:| щ %{SYNCS%}:| %{VCCH%}: | [CnsSoft | CnsAlv | CnsNonAlv| р] [%{VA%}:|%{VU%}:]]  %> _  ;
! Cns %> _  ;
!<=-rule conflict between "{аяØ}:а" and "{аяØ}:я".
!E.g. in context __HFST_TWOLC_.#.:__HFST_TWOLC_.#. ӈ:ӈ ь:ь щ:щ {VCS}: >:> _ __HFST_TWOLC_.#.:__HFST_TWOLC_.#.

"%{аяØ%}:я"
!! __@RULENAME@__
  %{аяØ%}:я <=> [%{VI%}: | [ь: | й:] Pal | [ь: | й:] [%{VA%}:|%{VU%}:]]  %> _  ;
               [ %{VU%}:| %{VA%}: ] %> %{ЫИ%}: %> _ ;
!  п а т т {VU}:0 > {ЫИ}:ы > {аяØ}:я н у в
  ! [ и | ы | ь: ] %> _  ;


"%{уюØ%}:0"
!! __@RULENAME@__ deletes а/я after VO vowel stems
%{уюØ%}:0 <=> [%{VO%}:]  %> _  ;
            [%{VI%}:]  %> _ м ;
!VowNoI  %> _  ;
            Cns  %{VU%}: %> _ %^RmVow: ;
!            Vow Cns %{VU%}: %> _ %^RmVow: м ;
!!€ ва̄р>{VU}>{уюØ}>^RmVow>ме
!!€ ва̄р>0>0>0>ме
